Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 4
PERMIT APPROVAL - PROCESS AND DEADLINE

Cross references:

For the short title ("Broadband Deployment Act") in HB 14-1327, see section 1 of chapter 149, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

29-27-401. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The permitting, construction, modification, maintenance, and operation of broadband facilities are critical to ensuring that all citizens in the state have true access to advanced technology and information;

These facilities are critical to ensuring that businesses and schools throughout the state remain competitive in the global economy; and

The permitting, construction, modification, maintenance, and operation of these facilities, to the extent specifically addressed in this part 4, are declared to be matters of statewide concern and interest.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

Small cell facilities often may be deployed most effectively in the public rights-of-way; and

Access to local government structures is essential to the construction and maintenance of wireless service facilities or broadband facilities.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1327), ch. 149, p. 504, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(2) added, (HB 17-1193), ch. 143, p. 474, § 1, effective July 1.

29-27-402. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Antenna" means communications equipment that transmits or receives electromagnetic radio frequency signals used to provide wireless service.

(1.5) "Broadband facility" means any infrastructure used to deliver broadband service or for the provision of broadband service.

"Broadband service" has the same meaning as set forth in 7 U.S.C. sec. 950bb (b)(1) as of August 6, 2014, and for the purposes of this section includes:

"Cable service", as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 522 (6) as of August 6, 2014;

"Telecommunications service", as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 153 as of August 6, 2014; and

"Wireless service", which means data and telecommunications services, including commercial mobile services, commercial mobile data services, unlicensed wireless services, and common carrier wireless exchange access services, as all of these terms are defined by federal law and regulations.

"Collocation" means the mounting or installation of broadband service equipment on a tower, building, or structure with existing broadband service equipment for the purpose of transmitting or receiving radio frequency signals for communications purposes.

(3.5) "Micro wireless facility" means a small wireless facility that is no larger in dimensions than twenty-four inches in length, fifteen inches in width, and twelve inches in height and that has an exterior antenna, if any, that is no more than eleven inches in length.

"Small cell facility" means either:

A personal wireless service facility as defined by the federal "Telecommunications Act of 1996", as amended as of August 6, 2014; or

A wireless service facility that meets both of the following qualifications:

Each antenna is located inside an enclosure of no more than three cubic feet in volume or, in the case of an antenna that has exposed elements, the antenna and all of its exposed elements could fit within an imaginary enclosure of no more than three cubic feet; and

Primary equipment enclosures are no larger than seventeen cubic feet in volume. The following associated equipment may be located outside of the primary equipment enclosure and, if so located, is not included in the calculation of equipment volume: Electric meter, concealment, telecommunications demarcation box, ground-based enclosures, back-up power systems, grounding equipment, power transfer switch, and cut-off switch.

"Small cell facility" includes a micro wireless facility.

"Small cell network" means a collection of interrelated small cell facilities designed to deliver wireless service.

"Structure" means any facility, tower, pole, building, or other structure constructed for the sole or primary purpose of supporting broadband facilities or wireless service facilities.

(6.5) "Tower" means any structure built for the sole or primary purpose of supporting antennas licensed or authorized by the federal communications commission and the antennas' associated facilities, including structures that are constructed for wireless communications services including private, broadcast, and public safety services; unlicensed wireless services; fixed wireless services such as backhaul; and the associated site.

"Wireless service facility" means a facility for the provision of wireless services; except that "wireless service facility" does not include coaxial or fiber-optic cable that is not immediately adjacent to, or directly associated with, a particular antenna.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1327), ch. 149, p. 505, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(1), (4), and (7) amended and (1.5), (3.5), and (6.5) added, (HB 17-1193), ch. 143, p. 474, § 2, effective July 1.

29-27-403. Permit - approval - deadline - exception.

A local government may take up to:

Ninety days to process a complete application for:

Location or collocation of a small cell facility or a small cell network; or

Replacement or modification of a small cell facility or facilities or small cell network.

Ninety days to process a complete application that involves a collocation of a tower, building, structure, or replacement structure other than a small cell facility or small cell network; or

One hundred fifty days to process a complete application that involves a new structure or a new wireless service facility, other than a small cell facility or small cell network and other than a collocation.

The time it takes for an applicant to respond to the first request for additional information will not count toward the applicable deadline set forth in subsection (1) of this section only if the local government notifies the applicant within thirty days after the initial filing that the application is incomplete. All other requests for additional information count toward such deadlines.

An applicant and a local government entity may mutually agree that an application may be processed in a longer period than set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1327), ch. 149, p. 506, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 17-1193), ch. 143, p. 475, § 3, effective July 1.

29-27-404. Permit process.

For small cell networks involving multiple individual small cell facilities within the jurisdiction of a single local government entity, the local government entity shall allow the applicant, at the applicant's discretion, to file a consolidated application and receive a single permit for the small cell network instead of filing separate applications for each individual small cell facility.

For a consolidated application filed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, each small cell facility within the consolidated application remains subject to review for compliance with objective requirements and approval as provided in this article 27. The local government's denial of any individual small cell facility is not a basis to deny the consolidated application as a whole or any other small cell facility incorporated within the consolidated application.

If a wireless service provider applies to locate or collocate several wireless service facilities within the jurisdiction of a single local government entity, the local government entity shall:

Allow the applicant, at the applicant's discretion, to file a single set of documents that will apply to all the wireless service facilities to be sited; and

Render a decision regarding all the wireless service facilities in a single administrative proceeding, unless local requirements call for an elected or appointed body to render such decision.

The siting, mounting, placement, construction, and operation of a small cell facility or a small cell network is a permitted use by right in any zone.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (HB 14-1327), ch. 149, p. 506, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(1) and IP(2) amended and (3) added, (HB 17-1193), ch. 143, p. 476, § 4, effective July 1.